Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2150.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 9-21 of the General Laws entitled "Judgments, Orders, and Decrees"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
9-21-14. Judgment lien notice.
(a) Notwithstanding any such notice provided through the court process, within ten (10)
business days of recording a judgment lien on real property, the judgment creditor shall send written
notice to the property owner by certified mail at the last known address.
(b) The notice shall include:
(1) The name and address of the judgment creditor;
(2) The amount of the judgment;
(3) The property description affected by the lien; and
(4) Instructions on how to satisfy or contest the lien.
(c) Failure to provide the required notice shall not invalidate the lien but may toll any
deadlines related to enforcement until notice is given.
(d) The clerk of the court shall maintain records of judgment lien filings and notices sent.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC003685
========